Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska11-110
Bonds; recording; copies; fee.

The officers with whom any official bonds are required by law to be filed shall carefully record and preserve the same in their respective offices, and shall give certified copies thereof, when required, under the seal of their office, and shall be entitled to receive for the same the usual fee allowed by law for certified copies of records in other cases.

Laws 1881, c. 13, § 10, p. 96;

R.S.1913, § 5716;

C.S.1922, § 5046;

C.S.1929, § 12-110;

R.S.1943, § 11-110.

Elected county officials are required to give individual official bonds. Blanket bond is not sufficient. Foote v. County of Adams, 163 Neb. 406, 80 N.W.2d 179 (1956).